District of Columbia statutes.
48-831.15

Annual summary report.

The Department shall submit a written report on the enrollment and financial status of AccessRx to the Council by the 2nd week of January each year.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 115, 51 DCR 3688